Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1593.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of economic security; adult protective services In addition to any other appropriations made in fiscal year 2026-2027, the sum of $3,000,000 and 43 FTE positions are appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of economic security for adult protective services.